Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2641.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 36-1696, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-1696. Firefighting foam; prohibition; public airport exception; definitions A. Beginning January 1, 2020, Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a person, local government or state agency may not discharge or otherwise use for training purposes any purpose class B firefighting foam that contains intentionally added PFAS chemicals unless otherwise required by law or federal regulation. The owner or operator of a public airport is not required to comply with this subsection until from and after December 31, 2030. B. Beginning January 1, 2020, a person, local government or state agency may not discharge or otherwise use for testing purposes class B firefighting foam that contains intentionally added PFAS chemicals unless otherwise required by law or federal regulation or the testing facility has implemented appropriate containment, treatment and disposal measures to prevent uncontrolled releases of firefighting foam into the environment. C. This section does not restrict the manufacture, sale or distribution of class B firefighting foam that contains intentionally added PFAS chemicals or the discharge or other use of class B firefighting foam in emergency firefighting or fire prevention operations. D. B. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Class B firefighting foam" means foam designed to extinguish a fire that involves a flammable liquid. 2. "Local government" includes any county, city, town, fire district or other special district that provides firefighting services. 3. "PFAS chemicals" means perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances that are a class of fluorinated organic chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom, that are designed to be fully functional in class B firefighting foam formulations and that are used as a firefighting agent. 4. "Testing" includes calibration testing, conformance testing and fixed system testing. 4. "Public airport" means aN AIRPORT THAT IS OWNED BY A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THIS STATE or that is otherwise open to the public. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Effective date This act is effective from and after December 31, 2028. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 4, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 5, 2026.